Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-4622
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act shall be construed or applied to conflict with federal law or any other law of the State of Nebraska, if such law is compatible with applicable federal law.

Laws 2025, LB168, § 5.